Missouri, session 2026, HB3239.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 173.831, RSMo, is repealed and two new sections enacted in lieu
2 thereof, to be known as sections 161.672 and 173.831, to read as follows:
161.672. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
2 (1) "Adult student", an individual who:
3 (a) Resides in this state;
4 (b) Does not have a high school diploma or a high school equivalency certificate
5 issued by any state;
6 (c) Is twenty-one years of age or older; and
7 (d) Has fewer than twelve credits remaining or a total of two academic years
8 remaining to achieve a high school diploma in the state of Missouri. For purposes of this
9 paragraph, the term "credits remaining" shall not be construed to include credits
10 earned toward career and technical education courses or attainment of an industry-
11 recognized credential, technical skills assessment, or stackable credential;
12 (2) "Adult virtual program", a state-approved virtual course or full-time virtual
13 program offered by a school district or a public institution of higher education.
14 2. An adult student may enroll in an adult virtual program and shall be eligible
15 to enroll in the Missouri course access and virtual school program established in section
16 161.670.
17 3. (1) An adult virtual program under this subsection shall not be entitled to any
18 moneys paid to the school district as ordinary school revenue including, but not limited
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HB 3239 2
19 to, local effort calculated under chapter 163. Such program provider shall be entitled to
20 receive a monthly state allocation from the department of elementary and secondary
21 education, derived solely from the state moneys the department collects and distributes
22 based on the state adequacy target as defined in section 163.011, in excess of any
23 minimum free public school funding and separate from any payment from the public
24 school fund as required by Article IX of the Constitution of Missouri. Subject only to
25 such restrictions, each successfully passed and completed course shall result in payment
26 to the program equal to fourteen percent of the state adequacy target.
27 (2) The total amount provided for an adult student enrolled in an adult virtual
28 program shall not exceed the state adequacy target.
29 (3) The total amount of moneys paid to program providers for adult students
30 under this subsection shall be limited to four million in any school year.
31 4. No school district with an adult student enrolled in an adult virtual program
32 shall be required to report such adult student's information for purposes of a report
33 submitted under section 160.522 or 161.670.
173.831. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
2 (1) "Academic skill intake assessment", a criterion-referenced assessment of
3 numeracy and literacy skills with high reliability and validity as determined by third-party
4 research;
5 (2) "Accredited", holding an active accreditation from one of the seven United States
6 regional accreditors including, but not limited to, the Middle States Commission on Higher
7 Education, the New England Association of Schools and Colleges, the Higher Learning
8 Commission, the Northwest Commission on Colleges and Universities, the Southern
9 Association of Colleges and Schools, the Western Association of Schools and Colleges, and
10 the Accrediting Commission for Community and Junior Colleges, as well as any successor
11 entities or consolidations of the above including, but not limited to, AdvancEd or Cognia;
12 (3) "Adult dropout recovery services" includes, but is not limited to, sourcing,
13 recruitment, and engagement of eligible students, learning plan development, active teaching,
14 and proactive coaching and mentoring, resulting in an accredited high school diploma and
15 pathway to post secondary education opportunities;
16 (4) "[Approved] Adult program provider", a public, not-for-profit, or other entity
17 [that meets the requirements of subdivision (2) of subsection 3 of this section or any
18 consortium of such entities] authorized under section 161.672;
19 (5) ["Average cost per graduate", the amount of the total program funding reimbursed
20 to an approved program provider for each cohort during the period of time from the beginning
21 of the same cohort through the subsequent twelve months after the close of the same cohort,

HCS HB 3239 3
22 divided by the total number of students who graduated from the same cohort within twelve
23 months after the close of the same cohort or enrollment in postsecondary education;
24 (6)] "Career pathways coursework", one or more courses that align with the skill
25 needs of industries in the economy of the state or region that help an individual enter or
26 advance within a specific occupation or occupational cluster;
27 [(7)] (6) "Career placement services", services designed to assist students in obtaining
28 employment, such as career interest self-assessments and job search skills such as resume
29 development and mock interviews;
30 [(8)] (7) "Coaching", proactive communication between the [approved] adult
31 program provider and the student related to the student's pace and progress through the
32 student's learning plan;
33 [(9)] (8) "Cohort", students who enter the program between July first and June
34 thirtieth of each program year;
35 [(10)] (9) "Department", the department of elementary and secondary education;
36 [(11)] (10) "Employability skills certification", a certificate earned by demonstrating
37 professional nontechnical skills through assessment, portfolio, or observation;
38 [(12)] (11) "Graduate", a student who has successfully completed all of the state and
39 approved program provider requirements in order to obtain a high school diploma;
40 [(13)] (12) "Graduation rate", the total number of graduates from a cohort who
41 graduated within twelve months after the close of the cohort divided by the total number of
42 students included in the same cohort;
43 [(14)] (13) "Graduation requirements", course and credit requirements for the
44 approved program provider's accredited high school diploma;
45 [(15)] (14) "High school diploma", a diploma issued by an accredited institution;
46 [(16)] (15) "Industry-recognized credential", an education-related credential or work-
47 related credential that verifies an individual's qualification or competence issued by a third
48 party with the relevant authority to issue such credential;
49 [(17)] (16) "Learning plan", a documented plan for courses or credits needed for each
50 individual in order to complete program and approved program provider graduation
51 requirements;
52 [(18)] (17) "Mentoring", a direct relationship between a coach and a student to
53 facilitate the completion of the student's learning plan designed to prepare the student to
54 succeed in the program and the student's future endeavors;
55 [(19) "Milestones", objective measures of progress for which payment is made to an
56 approved program provider under this section such as earned units of high school credit,
57 attainment of an employability skills certificate, attainment of an industry-recognized

HCS HB 3239 4
58 credential, attainment of a technical skills assessment, and attainment of an accredited high
59 school diploma;
60 (20)] (18) "Program", the workforce diploma program established in this section;
61 [(21) "Request for qualifications", a request for interested potential program
62 providers to submit evidence that they meet the qualifications established in subsection 3 of
63 this section;
64 (22)] (19) "Stackable credential", a third-party credential that is part of a sequence of
65 credentials that can be accumulated over time to build up an individual's qualifications to
66 advance along a career pathway;
67 [(23)] (20) "Student", a participant in the program established in this section who is
68 twenty-one years of age or older, who is a resident of Missouri, and who has not yet earned a
69 high school diploma;
70 [(24)] (21) "Technical skills assessment", a criterion-referenced assessment of an
71 individual's skills required for an entry-level career, or additional training in a technical field,
72 or other postsecondary opportunities;
73 [(25)] (22) "Transcript evaluation", a documented summary of credits earned in
74 previous public or private accredited high schools compared with the program and approved
75 program provider graduation requirements;
76 [(26)] (23) "Unit of high school credit", credit awarded based on a student's
77 demonstration that the student has successfully met the content expectations for the credit
78 area as defined by subject area standards, expectations, or guidelines.
79 2. There is hereby established the "Workforce Diploma Program" within the
80 department of elementary and secondary education to assist students with obtaining a high
81 school diploma and developing employability and career technical skills. The program may
82 be delivered in campus-based, blended, or online modalities.
83 3. [(1) Before September 1, 2022, and annually thereafter, the department shall issue
84 a request for qualifications for interested program providers to become approved program
85 providers and participate in the program.
86 (2) Each approved program provider shall meet all of the following qualifications:
87 (a) Be an accredited high school diploma-granting entity;
88 (b) Have a minimum of two years of experience providing adult dropout recovery
89 services;
90 (c) Provide academic skill intake assessments and transcript evaluations to each
91 student. Such academic skill intake assessments may be administered in person or online;
92 (d) Develop a learning plan for each student that integrates graduation requirements
93 and career goals;

HCS HB 3239 5
94 (e) Provide a course catalog that includes all courses necessary to meet graduation
95 requirements;
96 (f) Offer remediation opportunities in literacy and numeracy, as applicable;
97 (g) Offer employability skills certification, as applicable;
98 (h) Offer career pathways coursework, as applicable;
99 (i) Ability to provide preparation for industry-recognized credentials or stackable
100 credentials, a technical skills assessment, or a combination thereof; and
101 (j) Offer career placement services, as applicable.
102 (3) Upon confirmation by the department that an interested program provider meets
103 all of the qualifications listed in subdivision (2) of this subsection, an interested program
104 provider shall become an approved program provider.
105 4. (1) The department shall announce the approved program providers before
106 October sixteenth annually, with authorization for the approved program providers to begin
107 enrolling students before November fifteenth annually.
108 (2) Approved program providers shall maintain approval without reapplying annually
109 if the approved program provider has not been removed from the approved program provider
110 list under this section.
111 5. All approved program providers shall comply with requirements as provided by the
112 department to ensure:
113 (1) An accurate accounting of a student's accumulated credits toward a high school
114 diploma;
115 (2) An accurate accounting of credits necessary to complete a high school diploma;
116 and
117 (3) The provision of coursework aligned to the academic performance standards of
118 the state.
119 6. (1) Except as provided in subdivision (2) of this subsection, the department shall
120 pay an amount as set by the department to approved program providers for the following
121 milestones provided by the approved program provider:
122 (a) Completion of each half unit of high school credit;
123 (b) Attainment of an employability skills certification;
124 (c) Attainment of an industry-recognized credential, technical skills assessment, or
125 stackable credential requiring no more than fifty hours of training;
126 (d) Attainment of an industry-recognized credential or stackable credential requiring
127 at least fifty-one but no more than one hundred hours of training;
128 (e) Attainment of an industry-recognized credential or stackable credential requiring
129 more than one hundred hours of training; and
130 (f) Attainment of an accredited high school diploma.

HCS HB 3239 6
131 (2)] No [approved] adult program provider shall receive funding for a student under
132 [this] section 161.672 if the [approved] adult program provider receives federal [or state]
133 funding or private tuition for that student. No [approved] adult program provider shall
134 charge student fees of any kind including, but not limited to, textbook fees, tuition fees, lab
135 fees, or participation fees unless the student chooses to obtain additional education offered by
136 the [approved] adult program provider that is not included in the state-funded program.
137 [(3) Payments made under this subsection shall be subject to an appropriation made to
138 the department for such purposes.
139 7. (1) Approved program providers shall submit monthly invoices to the department
140 before the eleventh calendar day of each month for milestones met in the previous calendar
141 month.
142 (2) The department shall pay approved program providers in the order in which
143 invoices are submitted until all available funds are exhausted.
144 (3) The department shall provide a written update to approved program providers by
145 the last calendar day of each month. The update shall include the aggregate total dollars that
146 have been paid to approved program providers to date and the estimated number of
147 enrollments still available for the program year.
148 8.] 4. Before July sixteenth of each year, each adult provider shall report the
149 following metrics to the department for each individual cohort, on a cohort-by-cohort basis:
150 (1) The total number of students who have been funded through the program;
151 (2) The total number of credits earned;
152 (3) The total number of employability skills certifications issued;
153 (4) The total number of industry-recognized credentials, stackable credentials, and
154 technical skills assessments earned for each tier of funding; and
155 (5) The total number of graduates[;
156 (6) The average cost per graduate once the stipulated time to make such a calculation
157 has passed; and
158 (7) The graduation rate once the stipulated time to make such a calculation has
159 passed].
160 [9.] 5. (1) Before September sixteenth of each year, each [approved] adult program
161 provider shall conduct and submit to the department the aggregate results of a survey of each
162 individual cohort, on a cohort-by-cohort basis, who graduated from the program of the
163 [approved] adult program provider under this section. The survey shall be conducted in the
164 year after the year in which the individuals graduate and the next four consecutive years.
165 (2) The survey shall include at least the following data collection elements for each
166 year the survey is conducted:

HCS HB 3239 7
167 (a) The individual's employment status, including whether the individual is employed
168 full time or part time;
169 (b) The individual's hourly wages;
170 (c) The individual's access to employer-sponsored health care; and
171 (d) The individual's postsecondary enrollment status, including whether the
172 individual has completed a postsecondary certificate or degree program.
173 [10.] 6. (1) Beginning at the end of the second fiscal year of the program, the
174 department shall review data from each [approved] adult program provider to ensure that
175 each is achieving a minimum [program performance standards including, but not limited to:
176 (a) A minimum] fifty percent average graduation rate per cohort[; and
177 (b) An average cost per graduate per cohort of seven thousand dollars or less].
178 (2) Any [approved] adult program provider that fails to meet the minimum program
179 performance standards described in subdivision (1) of this subsection shall be placed on
180 probationary status for the remainder of the fiscal year by the department.
181 (3) Any [approved] adult program provider that fails to meet the minimum program
182 performance standards described in subdivision (1) of this subsection for two consecutive
183 years shall be removed from the Missouri course access and virtual school program under
184 section 161.670 approved program provider list by the department.
185 [11.] 7. (1) No [approved] adult program provider shall discriminate against a
186 student on the basis of race, color, religion, national origin, ancestry, sex, sexuality, gender, or
187 age.
188 (2) If an [approved] adultprogram provider determines that a student would be better
189 served by participating in a different program, the approved program provider may refer the
190 student to the state's adult basic education services.
191 [12. (1) There is hereby created in the state treasury the "Workforce Diploma
192 Program Fund", which shall consist of any grants, gifts, donations, bequests, or moneys
193 appropriated under this section. The state treasurer shall be custodian of the fund. In
194 accordance with sections 30.170 and 30.180, the state treasurer may approve disbursements.
195 The fund shall be a dedicated fund and, upon appropriation, moneys in the fund shall be used
196 solely as provided in this section.
197 (2) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 33.080 to the contrary, any moneys
198 remaining in the fund at the end of the biennium shall not revert to the credit of the general
199 revenue fund.
200 (3) The state treasurer shall invest moneys in the fund in the same manner as other
201 funds are invested. Any interest and moneys earned on such investments shall be credited to
202 the fund.

HCS HB 3239 8
203 13.] 8. The director of the department may promulgate all necessary rules and
204 regulations for the administration of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is
205 defined in section 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this section shall
206 become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536
207 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any
208 of the powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the
209 effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then
210 the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2022,
211 shall be invalid and void.
212 [14. Under section 23.253 of the Missouri sunset act:
213 (1) The provisions of the new program authorized under this section shall
214 automatically sunset six years after August 28, 2022, unless reauthorized by an act of the
215 general assembly; and
216 (2) If such program is reauthorized, the program authorized under this section shall
217 automatically sunset twelve years after the effective date of the reauthorization of this section;
218 and
219 (3) This section shall terminate on September first of the calendar year immediately
220 following the calendar year in which the program authorized under this section is sunset.
221 15. If any provision of this section or its application to any person or circumstance is
222 held invalid, such determination shall not affect the provisions or applications of the
223 remainder of this act which may be given effect without the invalid provision or application,
224 and to that end the provisions of this section are severable.]
✔